Utah statutes.
58-37c-17.   Inspection authority.
For the purpose of inspecting, copying, and auditing records and reports
required under this chapter and rules adopted pursuant thereto, and for the
purpose of inspecting an auditing inventories of listed controlled substance
precursors, the director, or his authorized agent, and law enforcement
personnel of any federal, state, or local law enforcement agency is authorized
to enter the premises of regulated distributors and regulated purchasers
during normal business hours to conduct administrative inspections.
